Utah statutes.
11-38-202.   Commission duties and powers -- No regulatory authority.

(1)  The commission shall:

(a)  make recommendations to the Legislature on how to define more specifically quality growth areas within the general guidelines provided to the commission by the Legislature;

(b)  advise the Legislature on growth management issues;

(c)  make recommendations to the Legislature on refinements to this chapter;

(d)  conduct a review in 2002 and each year thereafter to determine progress statewide on accomplishing the purposes of this chapter, and give a report of each review to the Political Subdivisions Interim Committee of the Legislature by November 30 of the year of the review;

(e)  administer the program as provided in this chapter;

(f)  assist as many local entities as possible, at their request, to identify principles of growth that the local entity may consider implementing to help achieve the highest possible quality of growth for that entity;

(g)  fulfill other responsibilities imposed on the commission by the Legislature; and

(h)  fulfill all other duties imposed on the commission by this chapter.

(2)  The commission may sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of equipment or personal property belonging to the program, the proceeds from which shall return to the fund.

(3)  The commission may not exercise any regulatory authority.



Amended by Chapter 368, 2009 General Session

